Utah, session 2026, HB271.
Section 1. Section 63A-16-1002 is amended to read:63A-16-1002. Public safety portal.(1)The commission shall oversee the creation and management of a public safety portal for information and data required to be reported to the commission and accessible to all criminal justice agencies in the state.(2)The division shall assist with the development and management of the public safety portal.(3)The division, in collaboration with the commission, shall create:(a)master standards and formats for information submitted to the public safety portal;(b)a gateway, bridge, website, or other method for reporting entities to provide the information;(c)a master data management index or system to assist in the retrieval of information from the public safety portal;(d)a protocol for accessing information in the public safety portal that complies with state privacy regulations; and(e)a protocol for real-time audit capability of all data accessed from the public safety portal by participating data source, data use entities, and regulators.(4)The public safety portal shall be the repository for the statutorily required data described in:(a)Section 13-53-111, Recidivism reporting requirements;(b)Section 17-72-408, County jail reporting requirements;(c)Section 17E-2-201, Criminal Justice Coordinating Councils reporting;(d)Section 26B-1-427, Alcohol Abuse Tracking Committee;(e)Section 41-6a-511, Courts to collect and maintain data;(f)Section 53-10-118, Regarding driving under the influence data;(g)Section 53-25-301, Reporting requirements for reverse-location warrants;(h)Section 53-25-202, Sexual assault offense reporting requirements for law enforcement agencies;(i)Section 53E-3-516, School disciplinary and law enforcement action report;(j)Section 53-25-501, Reporting requirements for seized firearms;(k)Section 53-25-502, Law enforcement agency reporting requirements for certain firearm data;(l)Section 63M-7-214, Law enforcement agency grant reporting;(m)Section 63M-7-216, Prosecutorial data collection;(n)Section 63M-7-216.1, Prosecutorial data collection regarding certain prosecutions, dismissals, and declinations to prosecute;(o)Section 63M-7-220, Domestic violence data collection;(p)Section 64-14-204, Supervision of sentenced offenders placed in community;(q)Section 64-13-25, Standards for programs;(r)Section 64-13-45, Department reporting requirements;(s)Section 64-13e-104, County correctional facility reimbursement program for state probationary inmates and state parole inmates;(t)Section 67-5-37, regarding catalytic converter thefts and arrests;(t)(u)Section 77-7-8.5, Use of tactical groups;(u)(v)Section 77-11b-404, Forfeiture reporting requirements;(v)(w)Section 77-20-103, Release data requirements;(w)(x)Section 77-22-2.5, Court orders for criminal investigations;(x)(y)Section 78A-2-109.5, Court data collection on criminal cases;(y)(z)Section 80-6-104, Data collection on offenses committed by minors; and(z)(aa)any other statutes that require the collection of specific data and the reporting of that data to the commission.(5)Before October 1, 2025, the commission shall report all data collected to the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee.(6)The commission may:(a)enter into contracts with private or governmental entities to assist entities in complying with the data reporting requirements of Subsection (4); and(b)make, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, rules to administer this section, including establishing requirements and procedures for collecting the data described in Subsection (4).

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 67-5-37 is amended to read:67-5-37. Multi-agency joint strike force -- Joint Organized Retail Crime Unit.(1)The Office of the Attorney General and the Department of Public Safety shall create and coordinate the operation of a multi-agency joint strike force to combat criminal activity that may have a negative impact on the state's economy.(2)The attorney general and the Department of Public Safety shall invite federal, state, and local law enforcement personnel to participate in the joint strike force to more effectively utilize their combined skills, expertise, and resources.(3)The joint strike force shall focus the joint strike force's efforts on detecting, investigating, deterring, and eradicating criminal activity, described in Subsection (1), within the state, including: (a)organized retail crime,; (b)antitrust violations,; (c)intellectual property rights violations,; (d)gambling,; (e)metal theft, including the theft of an item for the item's scrap or resale metal value; and (f)the purchase of stolen goods for the purpose of reselling the stolen goods for profit.(4)In conjunction with the joint strike force, the Office of the Attorney General and the Department of Public Safety shall establish the Joint Organized Retail Crime Unit for the purpose of:(a)investigating, apprehending, and prosecuting individuals or entities that participate in the purchase, sale, or distribution of stolen property; and(b)targeting individuals or entities that commit theft and other property crimes for financial gain.(5)(a)The joint strike force shall provide an annual report to the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee before December 1 that describes the joint strike force's activities and any recommendations for modifications to this section.(b)The report described in Subsection (5)(a) shall include the number of catalytic converter thefts and arrests in Utah for the preceding calendar year, if reasonably available.(6)The joint strike force shall provide to the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice created in Section 63M-7-201, before December 1 of each year, the number of catalytic converter thefts and arrests in Utah for the preceding calendar year, if reasonably available.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.